Hawaii statutes.
[§414D-306.5] Inspection of
records by directors. (a) A director of a corporation is entitled to
inspect and copy the books, records, and documents of the corporation,
including the records described in section 414D-301, at any reasonable time to
the extent reasonably related to the performance of the director's duties,
including the director's duties as a member of a committee, but not for any
other purpose or in any manner that would violate any duty to the corporation
or law.

(b) The circuit court of the county where the
corporation's principal office (or if none in this State, registered office) is
located may order inspection and copying of the books, records, and documents
demanded at the corporation's expense, upon application of a director who has
been refused such inspection or copying rights, unless the corporation
establishes that the director is not entitled to such inspection or copying
rights. The court shall dispose of an application under this subsection on an
expedited basis.

(c) If an order is issued, the court may
include provisions protecting the corporation from undue burden or expense, and
prohibiting the demanding director from using information obtained upon
exercise of the inspection or copying rights in a manner that would violate a
duty to the corporation, and may also order the corporation to reimburse the
demanding director for the director's costs, including reasonable attorney's
fees, incurred in connection with making the application. [L 2013, c 126, §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next